Illinois, session 104th, SB1739.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Sections 303 and 304 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/303)  (from Ch. 120, par. 3-303)7    Sec. 303. (a) In general. Any item of capital gain or loss, 8and any item of income from rents or royalties from real or 9tangible personal property, interest, dividends, and patent or 10copyright royalties, and prizes awarded under the Illinois 11Lottery Law, and, for taxable years ending on or after 12December 31, 2019, wagering and gambling winnings from 13Illinois sources as set forth in subsection (e-1) of this 14Section, and, for taxable years ending on or after December 1531, 2021, sports wagering and winnings from Illinois sources 16as set forth in subsection (e-2) of this Section, to the extent 17such item constitutes nonbusiness income, together with any 18item of deduction directly allocable thereto, shall be 19allocated by any person other than a resident as provided in 20this Section.21    (b) Capital gains and losses. 22        (1) Real property. Capital gains and losses from sales 23    or exchanges of real property are allocable to this State   SB1739- 2 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    if the property is located in this State.2        (2) Tangible personal property. Capital gains and 3    losses from sales or exchanges of tangible personal 4    property are allocable to this State if, at the time of 5    such sale or exchange:6            (A) The property had its situs in this State; or7            (B) The taxpayer had its commercial domicile in 8        this State and was not taxable in the state in which 9        the property had its situs.10        (3) Intangibles. Capital gains and losses from sales 11    or exchanges of intangible personal property are allocable 12    to this State if the taxpayer had its commercial domicile 13    in this State at the time of such sale or exchange.14        (4) Pass-through entities. Gains and losses from sales 15    or exchanges of shares in a Subchapter S corporation or 16    from an interest in a partnership, other than an 17    investment partnership as defined in paragraph (11.5) of 18    subsection (a) of Section 1501, are allocable to this 19    State if the pass-through entity is taxable in this State, 20    and those gains and losses shall be allocated in 21    proportion to the average of the pass-through entity's 22    Illinois apportionment factor computed under Section 304 23    in the year of the sale or exchange and the 2 tax years 24    immediately preceding the year of the sale or exchange. If 25    the pass-through entity was not in existence during both 26    of the preceding 2 years, then only the years in which the   SB1739- 3 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    pass-through entity was in existence shall be considered 2    when computing the average. 3    (c) Rents and royalties.4        (1) Real property. Rents and royalties from real 5    property are allocable to this State if the property is 6    located in this State.7        (2) Tangible personal property. Rents and royalties 8    from tangible personal property are allocable to this 9    State:10            (A) If and to the extent that the property is 11        utilized in this State; or12            (B) In their entirety if, at the time such rents or 13        royalties were paid or accrued, the taxpayer had its 14        commercial domicile in this State and was not 15        organized under the laws of or taxable with respect to 16        such rents or royalties in the state in which the 17        property was utilized. The extent of utilization of 18        tangible personal property in a state is determined by 19        multiplying the rents or royalties derived from such 20        property by a fraction, the numerator of which is the 21        number of days of physical location of the property in 22        the state during the rental or royalty period in the 23        taxable year and the denominator of which is the 24        number of days of physical location of the property 25        everywhere during all rental or royalty periods in the 26        taxable year. If the physical location of the property   SB1739- 4 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        during the rental or royalty period is unknown or 2        unascertainable by the taxpayer, tangible personal 3        property is utilized in the state in which the 4        property was located at the time the rental or royalty 5        payer obtained possession.6    (d) Patent and copyright royalties.7        (1) Allocation. Patent and copyright royalties are 8    allocable to this State:9            (A) If and to the extent that the patent or 10        copyright is utilized by the payer in this State; or11            (B) If and to the extent that the patent or 12        copyright is utilized by the payer in a state in which 13        the taxpayer is not taxable with respect to such 14        royalties and, at the time such royalties were paid or 15        accrued, the taxpayer had its commercial domicile in 16        this State.17        (2) Utilization.18            (A) A patent is utilized in a state to the extent 19        that it is employed in production, fabrication, 20        manufacturing or other processing in the state or to 21        the extent that a patented product is produced in the 22        state. If the basis of receipts from patent royalties 23        does not permit allocation to states or if the 24        accounting procedures do not reflect states of 25        utilization, the patent is utilized in this State if 26        the taxpayer has its commercial domicile in this   SB1739- 5 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        State.2            (B) A copyright is utilized in a state to the 3        extent that printing or other publication originates 4        in the state. If the basis of receipts from copyright 5        royalties does not permit allocation to states or if 6        the accounting procedures do not reflect states of 7        utilization, the copyright is utilized in this State 8        if the taxpayer has its commercial domicile in this 9        State.10    (e) Illinois lottery prizes. Prizes awarded under the 11Illinois Lottery Law are allocable to this State. Payments 12received in taxable years ending on or after December 31, 132013, from the assignment of a prize under Section 13.1 of the 14Illinois Lottery Law are allocable to this State.15    (e-1) Wagering and gambling winnings. Payments received in 16taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2019 of winnings 17from pari-mutuel wagering conducted at a wagering facility 18licensed under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 and from 19gambling games conducted on a riverboat or in a casino or 20organization gaming facility licensed under the Illinois 21Gambling Act are allocable to this State. 22    (e-2) Sports wagering and winnings. Payments received in 23taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2021 of winnings 24from sports wagering conducted in accordance with the Sports 25Wagering Act are allocable to this State. 26    (e-5) Unemployment benefits. Unemployment benefits paid by   SB1739- 6 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1the Illinois Department of Employment Security are allocable 2to this State. 3    (f) Taxability in other state. For purposes of allocation 4of income pursuant to this Section, a taxpayer is taxable in 5another state if:6        (1) In that state he is subject to a net income tax, a 7    franchise tax measured by net income, a franchise tax for 8    the privilege of doing business, or a corporate stock tax; 9    or10        (2) That state has jurisdiction to subject the 11    taxpayer to a net income tax regardless of whether, in 12    fact, the state does or does not.13    (g) Cross references. 14        (1) For allocation of interest and dividends by 15    persons other than residents, see Section 301(c)(2).16        (2) For allocation of nonbusiness income by residents, 17    see Section 301(a).18(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-40, eff. 6-25-21.) 19    (35 ILCS 5/304)  (from Ch. 120, par. 3-304)20    Sec. 304. Business income of persons other than residents. 21    (a) In general. The business income of a person other than 22a resident shall be allocated to this State if such person's 23business income is derived solely from this State. If a person 24other than a resident derives business income from this State 25and one or more other states, then, for tax years ending on or   SB1739- 7 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1before December 30, 1998, and except as otherwise provided by 2this Section, such person's business income shall be 3apportioned to this State by multiplying the income by a 4fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the property 5factor (if any), the payroll factor (if any) and 200% of the 6sales factor (if any), and the denominator of which is 4 7reduced by the number of factors other than the sales factor 8which have a denominator of zero and by an additional 2 if the 9sales factor has a denominator of zero. For tax years ending on 10or after December 31, 1998, and except as otherwise provided 11by this Section, persons other than residents who derive 12business income from this State and one or more other states 13shall compute their apportionment factor by weighting their 14property, payroll, and sales factors as provided in subsection 15(h) of this Section.16    (1) Property factor.17        (A) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator 18    of which is the average value of the person's real and 19    tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the 20    trade or business in this State during the taxable year 21    and the denominator of which is the average value of all 22    the person's real and tangible personal property owned or 23    rented and used in the trade or business during the 24    taxable year.25        (B) Property owned by the person is valued at its 26    original cost. Property rented by the person is valued at   SB1739- 8 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    8 times the net annual rental rate. Net annual rental rate 2    is the annual rental rate paid by the person less any 3    annual rental rate received by the person from 4    sub-rentals.5        (C) The average value of property shall be determined 6    by averaging the values at the beginning and ending of the 7    taxable year, but the Director may require the averaging 8    of monthly values during the taxable year if reasonably 9    required to reflect properly the average value of the 10    person's property.11    (2) Payroll factor.12        (A) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of 13    which is the total amount paid in this State during the 14    taxable year by the person for compensation, and the 15    denominator of which is the total compensation paid 16    everywhere during the taxable year.17        (B) Compensation is paid in this State if:18            (i) The individual's service is performed entirely 19        within this State;20            (ii) The individual's service is performed both 21        within and without this State, but the service 22        performed without this State is incidental to the 23        individual's service performed within this State; or24            (iii) For tax years ending prior to December 31, 25        2020, some of the service is performed within this 26        State and either the base of operations, or if there is   SB1739- 9 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        no base of operations, the place from which the 2        service is directed or controlled is within this 3        State, or the base of operations or the place from 4        which the service is directed or controlled is not in 5        any state in which some part of the service is 6        performed, but the individual's residence is in this 7        State. For tax years ending on or after December 31, 8        2020, compensation is paid in this State if some of the 9        individual's service is performed within this State, 10        the individual's service performed within this State 11        is nonincidental to the individual's service performed 12        without this State, and the individual's service is 13        performed within this State for more than 30 working 14        days during the tax year. The amount of compensation 15        paid in this State shall include the portion of the 16        individual's total compensation for services performed 17        on behalf of his or her employer during the tax year 18        which the number of working days spent within this 19        State during the tax year bears to the total number of 20        working days spent both within and without this State 21        during the tax year. For purposes of this paragraph: 22                (a) The term "working day" means all days 23            during the tax year in which the individual 24            performs duties on behalf of his or her employer. 25            All days in which the individual performs no 26            duties on behalf of his or her employer (e.g.,   SB1739- 10 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            weekends, vacation days, sick days, and holidays) 2            are not working days.3                (b) A working day is spent within this State 4            if: 5                    (1) the individual performs service on 6                behalf of the employer and a greater amount of 7                time on that day is spent by the individual 8                performing duties on behalf of the employer 9                within this State, without regard to time 10                spent traveling, than is spent performing 11                duties on behalf of the employer without this 12                State; or13                    (2) the only service the individual 14                performs on behalf of the employer on that day 15                is traveling to a destination within this 16                State, and the individual arrives on that day. 17                (c) Working days spent within this State do 18            not include any day in which the employee is 19            performing services in this State during a 20            disaster period solely in response to a request 21            made to his or her employer by the government of 22            this State, by any political subdivision of this 23            State, or by a person conducting business in this 24            State to perform disaster or emergency-related 25            services in this State. For purposes of this item 26            (c):   SB1739- 11 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                    "Declared State disaster or emergency" 2                means a disaster or emergency event (i) for 3                which a Governor's proclamation of a state of 4                emergency has been issued or (ii) for which a 5                Presidential declaration of a federal major 6                disaster or emergency has been issued. 7                    "Disaster period" means a period that 8                begins 10 days prior to the date of the 9                Governor's proclamation or the President's 10                declaration (whichever is earlier) and extends 11                for a period of 60 calendar days after the end 12                of the declared disaster or emergency period. 13                    "Disaster or emergency-related services" 14                means repairing, renovating, installing, 15                building, or rendering services or conducting 16                other business activities that relate to 17                infrastructure that has been damaged, 18                impaired, or destroyed by the declared State 19                disaster or emergency. 20                    "Infrastructure" means property and 21                equipment owned or used by a public utility, 22                communications network, broadband and Internet 23                internet service provider, cable and video 24                service provider, electric or gas distribution 25                system, or water pipeline that provides 26                service to more than one customer or person,   SB1739- 12 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                including related support facilities. 2                "Infrastructure" includes, but is not limited 3                to, real and personal property such as 4                buildings, offices, power lines, cable lines, 5                poles, communications lines, pipes, 6                structures, and equipment. 7            (iv) Compensation paid to nonresident professional 8        athletes.9            (a) General. The Illinois source income of a 10        nonresident individual who is a member of a 11        professional athletic team includes the portion of the 12        individual's total compensation for services performed 13        as a member of a professional athletic team during the 14        taxable year which the number of duty days spent 15        within this State performing services for the team in 16        any manner during the taxable year bears to the total 17        number of duty days spent both within and without this 18        State during the taxable year.19            (b) Travel days. Travel days that do not involve 20        either a game, practice, team meeting, or other 21        similar team event are not considered duty days spent 22        in this State. However, such travel days are 23        considered in the total duty days spent both within 24        and without this State.25            (c) Definitions. For purposes of this subpart 26        (iv):  SB1739- 13 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                (1) The term "professional athletic team" 2            includes, but is not limited to, any professional 3            baseball, basketball, football, soccer, or hockey 4            team.5                (2) The term "member of a professional 6            athletic team" includes those employees who are 7            active players, players on the disabled list, and 8            any other persons required to travel and who 9            travel with and perform services on behalf of a 10            professional athletic team on a regular basis. 11            This includes, but is not limited to, coaches, 12            managers, and trainers.13                (3) Except as provided in items (C) and (D) of 14            this subpart (3), the term "duty days" means all 15            days during the taxable year from the beginning of 16            the professional athletic team's official 17            pre-season training period through the last game 18            in which the team competes or is scheduled to 19            compete. Duty days shall be counted for the year 20            in which they occur, including where a team's 21            official pre-season training period through the 22            last game in which the team competes or is 23            scheduled to compete, occurs during more than one 24            tax year.25                    (A) Duty days shall also include days on 26                which a member of a professional athletic team   SB1739- 14 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                performs service for a team on a date that 2                does not fall within the foregoing period 3                (e.g., participation in instructional leagues, 4                the "All Star Game", or promotional 5                "caravans"). Performing a service for a 6                professional athletic team includes conducting 7                training and rehabilitation activities, when 8                such activities are conducted at team 9                facilities.10                    (B) Also included in duty days are game 11                days, practice days, days spent at team 12                meetings, promotional caravans, preseason 13                training camps, and days served with the team 14                through all post-season games in which the 15                team competes or is scheduled to compete.16                    (C) Duty days for any person who joins a 17                team during the period from the beginning of 18                the professional athletic team's official 19                pre-season training period through the last 20                game in which the team competes, or is 21                scheduled to compete, shall begin on the day 22                that person joins the team. Conversely, duty 23                days for any person who leaves a team during 24                this period shall end on the day that person 25                leaves the team. Where a person switches teams 26                during a taxable year, a separate duty-day   SB1739- 15 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                calculation shall be made for the period the 2                person was with each team.3                    (D) Days for which a member of a 4                professional athletic team is not compensated 5                and is not performing services for the team in 6                any manner, including days when such member of 7                a professional athletic team has been 8                suspended without pay and prohibited from 9                performing any services for the team, shall 10                not be treated as duty days.11                    (E) Days for which a member of a 12                professional athletic team is on the disabled 13                list and does not conduct rehabilitation 14                activities at facilities of the team, and is 15                not otherwise performing services for the team 16                in Illinois, shall not be considered duty days 17                spent in this State. All days on the disabled 18                list, however, are considered to be included 19                in total duty days spent both within and 20                without this State.21                (4) The term "total compensation for services 22            performed as a member of a professional athletic 23            team" means the total compensation received during 24            the taxable year for services performed:25                    (A) from the beginning of the official 26                pre-season training period through the last   SB1739- 16 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                game in which the team competes or is 2                scheduled to compete during that taxable year; 3                and4                    (B) during the taxable year on a date 5                which does not fall within the foregoing 6                period (e.g., participation in instructional 7                leagues, the "All Star Game", or promotional 8                caravans).9                This compensation shall include, but is not 10            limited to, salaries, wages, bonuses as described 11            in this subpart, and any other type of 12            compensation paid during the taxable year to a 13            member of a professional athletic team for 14            services performed in that year. This compensation 15            does not include strike benefits, severance pay, 16            termination pay, contract or option year buy-out 17            payments, expansion or relocation payments, or any 18            other payments not related to services performed 19            for the team.20                For purposes of this subparagraph, "bonuses" 21            included in "total compensation for services 22            performed as a member of a professional athletic 23            team" subject to the allocation described in 24            Section 302(c)(1) are: bonuses earned as a result 25            of play (i.e., performance bonuses) during the 26            season, including bonuses paid for championship,   SB1739- 17 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            playoff or "bowl" games played by a team, or for 2            selection to all-star league or other honorary 3            positions; and bonuses paid for signing a 4            contract, unless the payment of the signing bonus 5            is not conditional upon the signee playing any 6            games for the team or performing any subsequent 7            services for the team or even making the team, the 8            signing bonus is payable separately from the 9            salary and any other compensation, and the signing 10            bonus is nonrefundable. 11    (3) Sales factor.12        (A) The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of 13    which is the total sales of the person in this State during 14    the taxable year, and the denominator of which is the 15    total sales of the person everywhere during the taxable 16    year.17        (B) Sales of tangible personal property are in this 18    State if:19            (i) The property is delivered or shipped to a 20        purchaser, other than the United States government, 21        within this State regardless of the f. o. b. point or 22        other conditions of the sale; or23            (ii) The property is shipped from an office, 24        store, warehouse, factory or other place of storage in 25        this State and either the purchaser is the United 26        States government or the person is not taxable in the   SB1739- 18 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        state of the purchaser; provided, however, that 2        premises owned or leased by a person who has 3        independently contracted with the seller for the 4        printing of newspapers, periodicals or books shall not 5        be deemed to be an office, store, warehouse, factory 6        or other place of storage for purposes of this 7        Section. Sales of tangible personal property are not 8        in this State if the seller and purchaser would be 9        members of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that either the seller or purchaser is a person 11        with 80% or more of total business activity outside of 12        the United States and the property is purchased for 13        resale.14        (B-1) Patents, copyrights, trademarks, and similar 15    items of intangible personal property.16            (i) Gross receipts from the licensing, sale, or 17        other disposition of a patent, copyright, trademark, 18        or similar item of intangible personal property, other 19        than gross receipts governed by paragraph (B-7) of 20        this item (3), are in this State to the extent the item 21        is utilized in this State during the year the gross 22        receipts are included in gross income.23            (ii) Place of utilization.24                (I) A patent is utilized in a state to the 25            extent that it is employed in production, 26            fabrication, manufacturing, or other processing in   SB1739- 19 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            the state or to the extent that a patented product 2            is produced in the state. If a patent is utilized 3            in more than one state, the extent to which it is 4            utilized in any one state shall be a fraction 5            equal to the gross receipts of the licensee or 6            purchaser from sales or leases of items produced, 7            fabricated, manufactured, or processed within that 8            state using the patent and of patented items 9            produced within that state, divided by the total 10            of such gross receipts for all states in which the 11            patent is utilized.12                (II) A copyright is utilized in a state to the 13            extent that printing or other publication 14            originates in the state. If a copyright is 15            utilized in more than one state, the extent to 16            which it is utilized in any one state shall be a 17            fraction equal to the gross receipts from sales or 18            licenses of materials printed or published in that 19            state divided by the total of such gross receipts 20            for all states in which the copyright is utilized.21                (III) Trademarks and other items of intangible 22            personal property governed by this paragraph (B-1) 23            are utilized in the state in which the commercial 24            domicile of the licensee or purchaser is located.25            (iii) If the state of utilization of an item of 26        property governed by this paragraph (B-1) cannot be   SB1739- 20 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        determined from the taxpayer's books and records or 2        from the books and records of any person related to the 3        taxpayer within the meaning of Section 267(b) of the 4        Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 267, the gross 5        receipts attributable to that item shall be excluded 6        from both the numerator and the denominator of the 7        sales factor.8        (B-2) Gross receipts from the license, sale, or other 9    disposition of patents, copyrights, trademarks, and 10    similar items of intangible personal property, other than 11    gross receipts governed by paragraph (B-7) of this item 12    (3), may be included in the numerator or denominator of 13    the sales factor only if gross receipts from licenses, 14    sales, or other disposition of such items comprise more 15    than 50% of the taxpayer's total gross receipts included 16    in gross income during the tax year and during each of the 17    2 immediately preceding tax years; provided that, when a 18    taxpayer is a member of a unitary business group, such 19    determination shall be made on the basis of the gross 20    receipts of the entire unitary business group.21        (B-5) For taxable years ending on or after December 22    31, 2008, except as provided in subsections (ii) through 23    (vii), receipts from the sale of telecommunications 24    service or mobile telecommunications service are in this 25    State if the customer's service address is in this State.26            (i) For purposes of this subparagraph (B-5), the   SB1739- 21 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        following terms have the following meanings:2            "Ancillary services" means services that are 3        associated with or incidental to the provision of 4        "telecommunications services", including, but not 5        limited to, "detailed telecommunications billing", 6        "directory assistance", "vertical service", and "voice 7        mail services".8            "Air-to-Ground Radiotelephone service" means a 9        radio service, as that term is defined in 47 CFR 22.99, 10        in which common carriers are authorized to offer and 11        provide radio telecommunications service for hire to 12        subscribers in aircraft.13            "Call-by-call Basis" means any method of charging 14        for telecommunications services where the price is 15        measured by individual calls.16            "Communications Channel" means a physical or 17        virtual path of communications over which signals are 18        transmitted between or among customer channel 19        termination points.20            "Conference bridging service" means an "ancillary 21        service" that links two or more participants of an 22        audio or video conference call and may include the 23        provision of a telephone number. "Conference bridging 24        service" does not include the "telecommunications 25        services" used to reach the conference bridge.26            "Customer Channel Termination Point" means the   SB1739- 22 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        location where the customer either inputs or receives 2        the communications.3            "Detailed telecommunications billing service" 4        means an "ancillary service" of separately stating 5        information pertaining to individual calls on a 6        customer's billing statement.7            "Directory assistance" means an "ancillary 8        service" of providing telephone number information, 9        and/or address information.10            "Home service provider" means the facilities based 11        carrier or reseller with which the customer contracts 12        for the provision of mobile telecommunications 13        services.14            "Mobile telecommunications service" means 15        commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 16        20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations as 17        in effect on June 1, 1999.18            "Place of primary use" means the street address 19        representative of where the customer's use of the 20        telecommunications service primarily occurs, which 21        must be the residential street address or the primary 22        business street address of the customer. In the case 23        of mobile telecommunications services, "place of 24        primary use" must be within the licensed service area 25        of the home service provider.26            "Post-paid telecommunication service" means the   SB1739- 23 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        telecommunications service obtained by making a 2        payment on a call-by-call basis either through the use 3        of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank 4        card, travel card, credit card, or debit card, or by 5        charge made to a telephone number which is not 6        associated with the origination or termination of the 7        telecommunications service. A post-paid calling 8        service includes telecommunications service, except a 9        prepaid wireless calling service, that would be a 10        prepaid calling service except it is not exclusively a 11        telecommunication service.12            "Prepaid telecommunication service" means the 13        right to access exclusively telecommunications 14        services, which must be paid for in advance and which 15        enables the origination of calls using an access 16        number or authorization code, whether manually or 17        electronically dialed, and that is sold in 18        predetermined units or dollars of which the number 19        declines with use in a known amount.20            "Prepaid Mobile telecommunication service" means a 21        telecommunications service that provides the right to 22        utilize mobile wireless service as well as other 23        non-telecommunication services, including, but not 24        limited to, ancillary services, which must be paid for 25        in advance that is sold in predetermined units or 26        dollars of which the number declines with use in a   SB1739- 24 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        known amount.2            "Private communication service" means a 3        telecommunication service that entitles the customer 4        to exclusive or priority use of a communications 5        channel or group of channels between or among 6        termination points, regardless of the manner in which 7        such channel or channels are connected, and includes 8        switching capacity, extension lines, stations, and any 9        other associated services that are provided in 10        connection with the use of such channel or channels.11            "Service address" means:12                (a) The location of the telecommunications 13            equipment to which a customer's call is charged 14            and from which the call originates or terminates, 15            regardless of where the call is billed or paid;16                (b) If the location in line (a) is not known, 17            service address means the origination point of the 18            signal of the telecommunications services first 19            identified by either the seller's 20            telecommunications system or in information 21            received by the seller from its service provider 22            where the system used to transport such signals is 23            not that of the seller; and24                (c) If the locations in line (a) and line (b) 25            are not known, the service address means the 26            location of the customer's place of primary use.  SB1739- 25 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            "Telecommunications service" means the electronic 2        transmission, conveyance, or routing of voice, data, 3        audio, video, or any other information or signals to a 4        point, or between or among points. The term 5        "telecommunications service" includes such 6        transmission, conveyance, or routing in which computer 7        processing applications are used to act on the form, 8        code or protocol of the content for purposes of 9        transmission, conveyance or routing without regard to 10        whether such service is referred to as voice over 11        Internet protocol services or is classified by the 12        Federal Communications Commission as enhanced or value 13        added. "Telecommunications service" does not include:14                (a) Data processing and information services 15            that allow data to be generated, acquired, stored, 16            processed, or retrieved and delivered by an 17            electronic transmission to a purchaser when such 18            purchaser's primary purpose for the underlying 19            transaction is the processed data or information;20                (b) Installation or maintenance of wiring or 21            equipment on a customer's premises;22                (c) Tangible personal property;23                (d) Advertising, including, but not limited 24            to, directory advertising;25                (e) Billing and collection services provided 26            to third parties;  SB1739- 26 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                (f) Internet access service;2                (g) Radio and television audio and video 3            programming services, regardless of the medium, 4            including the furnishing of transmission, 5            conveyance and routing of such services by the 6            programming service provider. Radio and television 7            audio and video programming services shall 8            include, but not be limited to, cable service as 9            defined in 47 USC 522(6) and audio and video 10            programming services delivered by commercial 11            mobile radio service providers, as defined in 47 12            CFR 20.3;13                (h) "Ancillary services"; or14                (i) Digital products "delivered 15            electronically", including, but not limited to, 16            software, music, video, reading materials or 17            ringtones ring tones.18            "Vertical service" means an "ancillary service" 19        that is offered in connection with one or more 20        "telecommunications services", which offers advanced 21        calling features that allow customers to identify 22        callers and to manage multiple calls and call 23        connections, including "conference bridging services".24            "Voice mail service" means an "ancillary service" 25        that enables the customer to store, send or receive 26        recorded messages. "Voice mail service" does not   SB1739- 27 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        include any "vertical services" that the customer may 2        be required to have in order to utilize the "voice mail 3        service".4            (ii) Receipts from the sale of telecommunications 5        service sold on an individual call-by-call basis are 6        in this State if either of the following applies:7                (a) The call both originates and terminates in 8            this State.9                (b) The call either originates or terminates 10            in this State and the service address is located 11            in this State.12            (iii) Receipts from the sale of postpaid 13        telecommunications service at retail are in this State 14        if the origination point of the telecommunication 15        signal, as first identified by the service provider's 16        telecommunication system or as identified by 17        information received by the seller from its service 18        provider if the system used to transport 19        telecommunication signals is not the seller's, is 20        located in this State.21            (iv) Receipts from the sale of prepaid 22        telecommunications service or prepaid mobile 23        telecommunications service at retail are in this State 24        if the purchaser obtains the prepaid card or similar 25        means of conveyance at a location in this State. 26        Receipts from recharging a prepaid telecommunications   SB1739- 28 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        service or mobile telecommunications service is in 2        this State if the purchaser's billing information 3        indicates a location in this State.4            (v) Receipts from the sale of private 5        communication services are in this State as follows:6                (a) 100% of receipts from charges imposed at 7            each channel termination point in this State.8                (b) 100% of receipts from charges for the 9            total channel mileage between each channel 10            termination point in this State.11                (c) 50% of the total receipts from charges for 12            service segments when those segments are between 2 13            customer channel termination points, 1 of which is 14            located in this State and the other is located 15            outside of this State, which segments are 16            separately charged.17                (d) The receipts from charges for service 18            segments with a channel termination point located 19            in this State and in two or more other states, and 20            which segments are not separately billed, are in 21            this State based on a percentage determined by 22            dividing the number of customer channel 23            termination points in this State by the total 24            number of customer channel termination points.25            (vi) Receipts from charges for ancillary services 26        for telecommunications service sold to customers at   SB1739- 29 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        retail are in this State if the customer's primary 2        place of use of telecommunications services associated 3        with those ancillary services is in this State. If the 4        seller of those ancillary services cannot determine 5        where the associated telecommunications are located, 6        then the ancillary services shall be based on the 7        location of the purchaser. 8            (vii) Receipts to access a carrier's network or 9        from the sale of telecommunication services or 10        ancillary services for resale are in this State as 11        follows:12                (a) 100% of the receipts from access fees 13            attributable to intrastate telecommunications 14            service that both originates and terminates in 15            this State.16                (b) 50% of the receipts from access fees 17            attributable to interstate telecommunications 18            service if the interstate call either originates 19            or terminates in this State.20                (c) 100% of the receipts from interstate end 21            user access line charges, if the customer's 22            service address is in this State. As used in this 23            subdivision, "interstate end user access line 24            charges" includes, but is not limited to, the 25            surcharge approved by the federal communications 26            commission and levied pursuant to 47 CFR 69.  SB1739- 30 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                (d) Gross receipts from sales of 2            telecommunication services or from ancillary 3            services for telecommunications services sold to 4            other telecommunication service providers for 5            resale shall be sourced to this State using the 6            apportionment concepts used for non-resale 7            receipts of telecommunications services if the 8            information is readily available to make that 9            determination. If the information is not readily 10            available, then the taxpayer may use any other 11            reasonable and consistent method. 12        (B-7) For taxable years ending on or after December 13    31, 2008, receipts from the sale of broadcasting services 14    are in this State if the broadcasting services are 15    received in this State. For purposes of this paragraph 16    (B-7), the following terms have the following meanings:17            "Advertising revenue" means consideration received 18        by the taxpayer in exchange for broadcasting services 19        or allowing the broadcasting of commercials or 20        announcements in connection with the broadcasting of 21        film or radio programming, from sponsorships of the 22        programming, or from product placements in the 23        programming.24            "Audience factor" means the ratio that the 25        audience or subscribers located in this State of a 26        station, a network, or a cable system bears to the   SB1739- 31 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        total audience or total subscribers for that station, 2        network, or cable system. The audience factor for film 3        or radio programming shall be determined by reference 4        to the books and records of the taxpayer or by 5        reference to published rating statistics provided the 6        method used by the taxpayer is consistently used from 7        year to year for this purpose and fairly represents 8        the taxpayer's activity in this State.9            "Broadcast" or "broadcasting" or "broadcasting 10        services" means the transmission or provision of film 11        or radio programming, whether through the public 12        airwaves, by cable, by direct or indirect satellite 13        transmission, or by any other means of communication, 14        either through a station, a network, or a cable 15        system.16            "Film" or "film programming" means the broadcast 17        on television of any and all performances, events, or 18        productions, including, but not limited to, news, 19        sporting events, plays, stories, or other literary, 20        commercial, educational, or artistic works, either 21        live or through the use of video tape, disc, or any 22        other type of format or medium. Each episode of a 23        series of films produced for television shall 24        constitute a separate "film" notwithstanding that the 25        series relates to the same principal subject and is 26        produced during one or more tax periods.  SB1739- 32 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            "Radio" or "radio programming" means the broadcast 2        on radio of any and all performances, events, or 3        productions, including, but not limited to, news, 4        sporting events, plays, stories, or other literary, 5        commercial, educational, or artistic works, either 6        live or through the use of an audio tape, disc, or any 7        other format or medium. Each episode in a series of 8        radio programming produced for radio broadcast shall 9        constitute a separate "radio programming" 10        notwithstanding that the series relates to the same 11        principal subject and is produced during one or more 12        tax periods.13                (i) In the case of advertising revenue from 14            broadcasting, the customer is the advertiser and 15            the service is received in this State if the 16            commercial domicile of the advertiser is in this 17            State.18                (ii) In the case where film or radio 19            programming is broadcast by a station, a network, 20            or a cable system for a fee or other remuneration 21            received from the recipient of the broadcast, the 22            portion of the service that is received in this 23            State is measured by the portion of the recipients 24            of the broadcast located in this State. 25            Accordingly, the fee or other remuneration for 26            such service that is included in the Illinois   SB1739- 33 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            numerator of the sales factor is the total of 2            those fees or other remuneration received from 3            recipients in Illinois. For purposes of this 4            paragraph, a taxpayer may determine the location 5            of the recipients of its broadcast using the 6            address of the recipient shown in its contracts 7            with the recipient or using the billing address of 8            the recipient in the taxpayer's records.9                (iii) In the case where film or radio 10            programming is broadcast by a station, a network, 11            or a cable system for a fee or other remuneration 12            from the person providing the programming, the 13            portion of the broadcast service that is received 14            by such station, network, or cable system in this 15            State is measured by the portion of recipients of 16            the broadcast located in this State. Accordingly, 17            the amount of revenue related to such an 18            arrangement that is included in the Illinois 19            numerator of the sales factor is the total fee or 20            other total remuneration from the person providing 21            the programming related to that broadcast 22            multiplied by the Illinois audience factor for 23            that broadcast.24                (iv) In the case where film or radio 25            programming is provided by a taxpayer that is a 26            network or station to a customer for broadcast in   SB1739- 34 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            exchange for a fee or other remuneration from that 2            customer the broadcasting service is received at 3            the location of the office of the customer from 4            which the services were ordered in the regular 5            course of the customer's trade or business. 6            Accordingly, in such a case the revenue derived by 7            the taxpayer that is included in the taxpayer's 8            Illinois numerator of the sales factor is the 9            revenue from such customers who receive the 10            broadcasting service in Illinois.11                (v) In the case where film or radio 12            programming is provided by a taxpayer that is not 13            a network or station to another person for 14            broadcasting in exchange for a fee or other 15            remuneration from that person, the broadcasting 16            service is received at the location of the office 17            of the customer from which the services were 18            ordered in the regular course of the customer's 19            trade or business. Accordingly, in such a case the 20            revenue derived by the taxpayer that is included 21            in the taxpayer's Illinois numerator of the sales 22            factor is the revenue from such customers who 23            receive the broadcasting service in Illinois.24        (B-8) Gross receipts from winnings under the Illinois 25    Lottery Law from the assignment of a prize under Section 26    13.1 of the Illinois Lottery Law are received in this   SB1739- 35 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    State. This paragraph (B-8) applies only to taxable years 2    ending on or after December 31, 2013. 3        (B-9) For taxable years ending on or after December 4    31, 2019, gross receipts from winnings from pari-mutuel 5    wagering conducted at a wagering facility licensed under 6    the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or from winnings 7    from gambling games conducted on a riverboat or in a 8    casino or organization gaming facility licensed under the 9    Illinois Gambling Act are in this State.10        (B-10) For taxable years ending on or after December 11    31, 2021, gross receipts from winnings from sports 12    wagering conducted in accordance with the Sports Wagering 13    Act are in this State. 14        (C) For taxable years ending before December 31, 2008, 15    sales, other than sales governed by paragraphs (B), (B-1), 16    (B-2), and (B-8) are in this State if:17            (i) The income-producing activity is performed in 18        this State; or19            (ii) The income-producing activity is performed 20        both within and without this State and a greater 21        proportion of the income-producing activity is 22        performed within this State than without this State, 23        based on performance costs.24        (C-5) For taxable years ending on or after December 25    31, 2008, sales, other than sales governed by paragraphs 26    (B), (B-1), (B-2), (B-5), and (B-7), are in this State if   SB1739- 36 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    any of the following criteria are met:2            (i) Sales from the sale or lease of real property 3        are in this State if the property is located in this 4        State.5            (ii) Sales from the lease or rental of tangible 6        personal property are in this State if the property is 7        located in this State during the rental period. Sales 8        from the lease or rental of tangible personal property 9        that is characteristically moving property, including, 10        but not limited to, motor vehicles, rolling stock, 11        aircraft, vessels, or mobile equipment are in this 12        State to the extent that the property is used in this 13        State.14            (iii) In the case of interest, net gains (but not 15        less than zero) and other items of income from 16        intangible personal property, the sale is in this 17        State if:18                (a) in the case of a taxpayer who is a dealer 19            in the item of intangible personal property within 20            the meaning of Section 475 of the Internal Revenue 21            Code, the income or gain is received from a 22            customer in this State. For purposes of this 23            subparagraph, a customer is in this State if the 24            customer is an individual, trust or estate who is 25            a resident of this State and, for all other 26            customers, if the customer's commercial domicile   SB1739- 37 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            is in this State. Unless the dealer has actual 2            knowledge of the residence or commercial domicile 3            of a customer during a taxable year, the customer 4            shall be deemed to be a customer in this State if 5            the billing address of the customer, as shown in 6            the records of the dealer, is in this State; or7                (a-5) in the case of the sale or exchange of 8            shares in a Subchapter S corporation or an 9            interest in a partnership, other than an 10            investment partnership as defined in paragraph 11            (11.5) of subsection (a) of Section 1501, the 12            Subchapter S corporation or partnership was 13            taxable in this State; for purposes of this 14            subparagraph, the amount attributable to this 15            State shall be determined in proportion to the 16            average of the pass-through entity's Illinois 17            apportionment factor computed under this Section 18            in the year of the sale or exchange and the 2 tax 19            years immediately preceding the year of the sale 20            or exchange; if the pass-through entity was not in 21            existence during both of the preceding 2 years, 22            then only the years in which the pass-through 23            entity was in existence shall be considered when 24            computing the average; or 25                (b) in all other cases, if the 26            income-producing activity of the taxpayer is   SB1739- 38 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            performed in this State or, if the 2            income-producing activity of the taxpayer is 3            performed both within and without this State, if a 4            greater proportion of the income-producing 5            activity of the taxpayer is performed within this 6            State than in any other state, based on 7            performance costs.8            (iv) Sales of services are in this State if the 9        services are received in this State. For the purposes 10        of this section, gross receipts from the performance 11        of services provided to a corporation, partnership, or 12        trust may only be attributed to a state where that 13        corporation, partnership, or trust has a fixed place 14        of business. If the state where the services are 15        received is not readily determinable or is a state 16        where the corporation, partnership, or trust receiving 17        the service does not have a fixed place of business, 18        the services shall be deemed to be received at the 19        location of the office of the customer from which the 20        services were ordered in the regular course of the 21        customer's trade or business. If the ordering office 22        cannot be determined, the services shall be deemed to 23        be received at the office of the customer to which the 24        services are billed. If the taxpayer is not taxable in 25        the state in which the services are received, the sale 26        must be excluded from both the numerator and the   SB1739- 39 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        denominator of the sales factor. The Department shall 2        adopt rules prescribing where specific types of 3        service are received, including, but not limited to, 4        publishing, and utility service. 5        (D) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 6    1995, the following items of income shall not be included 7    in the numerator or denominator of the sales factor: 8    dividends; amounts included under Section 78 of the 9    Internal Revenue Code; and Subpart F income as defined in 10    Section 952 of the Internal Revenue Code. No inference 11    shall be drawn from the enactment of this paragraph (D) in 12    construing this Section for taxable years ending before 13    December 31, 1995.14        (E) Paragraphs (B-1) and (B-2) shall apply to tax 15    years ending on or after December 31, 1999, provided that 16    a taxpayer may elect to apply the provisions of these 17    paragraphs to prior tax years. Such election shall be made 18    in the form and manner prescribed by the Department, shall 19    be irrevocable, and shall apply to all tax years; provided 20    that, if a taxpayer's Illinois income tax liability for 21    any tax year, as assessed under Section 903 prior to 22    January 1, 1999, was computed in a manner contrary to the 23    provisions of paragraphs (B-1) or (B-2), no refund shall 24    be payable to the taxpayer for that tax year to the extent 25    such refund is the result of applying the provisions of 26    paragraph (B-1) or (B-2) retroactively. In the case of a   SB1739- 40 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    unitary business group, such election shall apply to all 2    members of such group for every tax year such group is in 3    existence, but shall not apply to any taxpayer for any 4    period during which that taxpayer is not a member of such 5    group.6    (b) Insurance companies.7        (1) In general. Except as otherwise provided by 8    paragraph (2), business income of an insurance company for 9    a taxable year shall be apportioned to this State by 10    multiplying such income by a fraction, the numerator of 11    which is the direct premiums written for insurance upon 12    property or risk in this State, and the denominator of 13    which is the direct premiums written for insurance upon 14    property or risk everywhere. For purposes of this 15    subsection, the term "direct premiums written" means the 16    total amount of direct premiums written, assessments and 17    annuity considerations as reported for the taxable year on 18    the annual statement filed by the company with the 19    Illinois Director of Insurance in the form approved by the 20    National Convention of Insurance Commissioners or such 21    other form as may be prescribed in lieu thereof.22        (2) Reinsurance. If the principal source of premiums 23    written by an insurance company consists of premiums for 24    reinsurance accepted by it, the business income of such 25    company shall be apportioned to this State by multiplying 26    such income by a fraction, the numerator of which is the   SB1739- 41 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    sum of (i) direct premiums written for insurance upon 2    property or risk in this State, plus (ii) premiums written 3    for reinsurance accepted in respect of property or risk in 4    this State, and the denominator of which is the sum of 5    (iii) direct premiums written for insurance upon property 6    or risk everywhere, plus (iv) premiums written for 7    reinsurance accepted in respect of property or risk 8    everywhere. For purposes of this paragraph, premiums 9    written for reinsurance accepted in respect of property or 10    risk in this State, whether or not otherwise determinable, 11    may, at the election of the company, be determined on the 12    basis of the proportion which premiums written for 13    reinsurance accepted from companies commercially domiciled 14    in Illinois bears to premiums written for reinsurance 15    accepted from all sources, or, alternatively, in the 16    proportion which the sum of the direct premiums written 17    for insurance upon property or risk in this State by each 18    ceding company from which reinsurance is accepted bears to 19    the sum of the total direct premiums written by each such 20    ceding company for the taxable year. The election made by 21    a company under this paragraph for its first taxable year 22    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall be binding for 23    that company for that taxable year and for all subsequent 24    taxable years, and may be altered only with the written 25    permission of the Department, which shall not be 26    unreasonably withheld.  SB1739- 42 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    (c) Financial organizations.2        (1) In general. For taxable years ending before 3    December 31, 2008, business income of a financial 4    organization shall be apportioned to this State by 5    multiplying such income by a fraction, the numerator of 6    which is its business income from sources within this 7    State, and the denominator of which is its business income 8    from all sources. For the purposes of this subsection, the 9    business income of a financial organization from sources 10    within this State is the sum of the amounts referred to in 11    subparagraphs (A) through (E) following, but excluding the 12    adjusted income of an international banking facility as 13    determined in paragraph (2):14            (A) Fees, commissions or other compensation for 15        financial services rendered within this State;16            (B) Gross profits from trading in stocks, bonds or 17        other securities managed within this State;18            (C) Dividends, and interest from Illinois 19        customers, which are received within this State;20            (D) Interest charged to customers at places of 21        business maintained within this State for carrying 22        debit balances of margin accounts, without deduction 23        of any costs incurred in carrying such accounts; and24            (E) Any other gross income resulting from the 25        operation as a financial organization within this 26        State.   SB1739- 43 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        In computing the amounts referred to in paragraphs (A) 2    through (E) of this subsection, any amount received by a 3    member of an affiliated group (determined under Section 4    1504(a) of the Internal Revenue Code but without reference 5    to whether any such corporation is an "includible 6    corporation" under Section 1504(b) of the Internal Revenue 7    Code) from another member of such group shall be included 8    only to the extent such amount exceeds expenses of the 9    recipient directly related thereto.10        (2) International Banking Facility. For taxable years 11    ending before December 31, 2008:12            (A) Adjusted Income. The adjusted income of an 13        international banking facility is its income reduced 14        by the amount of the floor amount.15            (B) Floor Amount. The floor amount shall be the 16        amount, if any, determined by multiplying the income 17        of the international banking facility by a fraction, 18        not greater than one, which is determined as follows:19                (i) The numerator shall be:20                The average aggregate, determined on a 21            quarterly basis, of the financial organization's 22            loans to banks in foreign countries, to foreign 23            domiciled borrowers (except where secured 24            primarily by real estate) and to foreign 25            governments and other foreign official 26            institutions, as reported for its branches,   SB1739- 44 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            agencies and offices within the state on its 2            "Consolidated Report of Condition", Schedule A, 3            Lines 2.c., 5.b., and 7.a., which was filed with 4            the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and 5            other regulatory authorities, for the year 1980, 6            minus7                The average aggregate, determined on a 8            quarterly basis, of such loans (other than loans 9            of an international banking facility), as reported 10            by the financial institution for its branches, 11            agencies and offices within the state, on the 12            corresponding Schedule and lines of the 13            Consolidated Report of Condition for the current 14            taxable year, provided, however, that in no case 15            shall the amount determined in this clause (the 16            subtrahend) exceed the amount determined in the 17            preceding clause (the minuend); and18                (ii) the denominator shall be the average 19            aggregate, determined on a quarterly basis, of the 20            international banking facility's loans to banks in 21            foreign countries, to foreign domiciled borrowers 22            (except where secured primarily by real estate) 23            and to foreign governments and other foreign 24            official institutions, which were recorded in its 25            financial accounts for the current taxable year.26            (C) Change to Consolidated Report of Condition and   SB1739- 45 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        in Qualification. In the event the Consolidated Report 2        of Condition which is filed with the Federal Deposit 3        Insurance Corporation and other regulatory authorities 4        is altered so that the information required for 5        determining the floor amount is not found on Schedule 6        A, lines 2.c., 5.b. and 7.a., the financial 7        institution shall notify the Department and the 8        Department may, by regulations or otherwise, prescribe 9        or authorize the use of an alternative source for such 10        information. The financial institution shall also 11        notify the Department should its international banking 12        facility fail to qualify as such, in whole or in part, 13        or should there be any amendment or change to the 14        Consolidated Report of Condition, as originally filed, 15        to the extent such amendment or change alters the 16        information used in determining the floor amount.17        (3) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 18    2008, the business income of a financial organization 19    shall be apportioned to this State by multiplying such 20    income by a fraction, the numerator of which is its gross 21    receipts from sources in this State or otherwise 22    attributable to this State's marketplace and the 23    denominator of which is its gross receipts everywhere 24    during the taxable year. "Gross receipts" for purposes of 25    this subparagraph (3) means gross income, including net 26    taxable gain on disposition of assets, including   SB1739- 46 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    securities and money market instruments, when derived from 2    transactions and activities in the regular course of the 3    financial organization's trade or business. The following 4    examples are illustrative: 5            (i) Receipts from the lease or rental of real or 6        tangible personal property are in this State if the 7        property is located in this State during the rental 8        period. Receipts from the lease or rental of tangible 9        personal property that is characteristically moving 10        property, including, but not limited to, motor 11        vehicles, rolling stock, aircraft, vessels, or mobile 12        equipment are from sources in this State to the extent 13        that the property is used in this State.14            (ii) Interest income, commissions, fees, gains on 15        disposition, and other receipts from assets in the 16        nature of loans that are secured primarily by real 17        estate or tangible personal property are from sources 18        in this State if the security is located in this State.19            (iii) Interest income, commissions, fees, gains on 20        disposition, and other receipts from consumer loans 21        that are not secured by real or tangible personal 22        property are from sources in this State if the debtor 23        is a resident of this State.24            (iv) Interest income, commissions, fees, gains on 25        disposition, and other receipts from commercial loans 26        and installment obligations that are not secured by   SB1739- 47 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        real or tangible personal property are from sources in 2        this State if the proceeds of the loan are to be 3        applied in this State. If it cannot be determined 4        where the funds are to be applied, the income and 5        receipts are from sources in this State if the office 6        of the borrower from which the loan was negotiated in 7        the regular course of business is located in this 8        State. If the location of this office cannot be 9        determined, the income and receipts shall be excluded 10        from the numerator and denominator of the sales 11        factor. 12            (v) Interest income, fees, gains on disposition, 13        service charges, merchant discount income, and other 14        receipts from credit card receivables are from sources 15        in this State if the card charges are regularly billed 16        to a customer in this State.17            (vi) Receipts from the performance of services, 18        including, but not limited to, fiduciary, advisory, 19        and brokerage services, are in this State if the 20        services are received in this State within the meaning 21        of subparagraph (a)(3)(C-5)(iv) of this Section.22            (vii) Receipts from the issuance of travelers 23        checks and money orders are from sources in this State 24        if the checks and money orders are issued from a 25        location within this State.26            (viii) For tax years ending before December 31,   SB1739- 48 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        2024, receipts from investment assets and activities 2        and trading assets and activities are included in the 3        receipts factor as follows:4                (1) Interest, dividends, net gains (but not 5            less than zero) and other income from investment 6            assets and activities from trading assets and 7            activities shall be included in the receipts 8            factor. Investment assets and activities and 9            trading assets and activities include, but are not 10            limited to: investment securities; trading account 11            assets; federal funds; securities purchased and 12            sold under agreements to resell or repurchase; 13            options; futures contracts; forward contracts; 14            notional principal contracts such as swaps; 15            equities; and foreign currency transactions. With 16            respect to the investment and trading assets and 17            activities described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) 18            of this paragraph, the receipts factor shall 19            include the amounts described in such 20            subparagraphs.21                    (A) The receipts factor shall include the 22                amount by which interest from federal funds 23                sold and securities purchased under resale 24                agreements exceeds interest expense on federal 25                funds purchased and securities sold under 26                repurchase agreements.  SB1739- 49 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                    (B) The receipts factor shall include the 2                amount by which interest, dividends, gains and 3                other income from trading assets and 4                activities, including, but not limited to, 5                assets and activities in the matched book, in 6                the arbitrage book, and foreign currency 7                transactions, exceed amounts paid in lieu of 8                interest, amounts paid in lieu of dividends, 9                and losses from such assets and activities.10                (2) The numerator of the receipts factor 11            includes interest, dividends, net gains (but not 12            less than zero), and other income from investment 13            assets and activities and from trading assets and 14            activities described in paragraph (1) of this 15            subsection that are attributable to this State.16                    (A) The amount of interest, dividends, net 17                gains (but not less than zero), and other 18                income from investment assets and activities 19                in the investment account to be attributed to 20                this State and included in the numerator is 21                determined by multiplying all such income from 22                such assets and activities by a fraction, the 23                numerator of which is the gross income from 24                such assets and activities which are properly 25                assigned to a fixed place of business of the 26                taxpayer within this State and the denominator   SB1739- 50 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                of which is the gross income from all such 2                assets and activities.3                    (B) The amount of interest from federal 4                funds sold and purchased and from securities 5                purchased under resale agreements and 6                securities sold under repurchase agreements 7                attributable to this State and included in the 8                numerator is determined by multiplying the 9                amount described in subparagraph (A) of 10                paragraph (1) of this subsection from such 11                funds and such securities by a fraction, the 12                numerator of which is the gross income from 13                such funds and such securities which are 14                properly assigned to a fixed place of business 15                of the taxpayer within this State and the 16                denominator of which is the gross income from 17                all such funds and such securities.18                    (C) The amount of interest, dividends, 19                gains, and other income from trading assets 20                and activities, including, but not limited to, 21                assets and activities in the matched book, in 22                the arbitrage book and foreign currency 23                transactions (but excluding amounts described 24                in subparagraphs (A) or (B) of this 25                paragraph), attributable to this State and 26                included in the numerator is determined by   SB1739- 51 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                multiplying the amount described in 2                subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this 3                subsection by a fraction, the numerator of 4                which is the gross income from such trading 5                assets and activities which are properly 6                assigned to a fixed place of business of the 7                taxpayer within this State and the denominator 8                of which is the gross income from all such 9                assets and activities.10                    (D) Properly assigned, for purposes of 11                this paragraph (2) of this subsection, means 12                the investment or trading asset or activity is 13                assigned to the fixed place of business with 14                which it has a preponderance of substantive 15                contacts. An investment or trading asset or 16                activity assigned by the taxpayer to a fixed 17                place of business without the State shall be 18                presumed to have been properly assigned if:19                        (i) the taxpayer has assigned, in the 20                    regular course of its business, such asset 21                    or activity on its records to a fixed 22                    place of business consistent with federal 23                    or state regulatory requirements;24                        (ii) such assignment on its records is 25                    based upon substantive contacts of the 26                    asset or activity to such fixed place of   SB1739- 52 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                    business; and2                        (iii) the taxpayer uses such records 3                    reflecting assignment of such assets or 4                    activities for the filing of all state and 5                    local tax returns for which an assignment 6                    of such assets or activities to a fixed 7                    place of business is required.8                    (E) The presumption of proper assignment 9                of an investment or trading asset or activity 10                provided in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) 11                of this subsection may be rebutted upon a 12                showing by the Department, supported by a 13                preponderance of the evidence, that the 14                preponderance of substantive contacts 15                regarding such asset or activity did not occur 16                at the fixed place of business to which it was 17                assigned on the taxpayer's records. If the 18                fixed place of business that has a 19                preponderance of substantive contacts cannot 20                be determined for an investment or trading 21                asset or activity to which the presumption in 22                subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of this 23                subsection does not apply or with respect to 24                which that presumption has been rebutted, that 25                asset or activity is properly assigned to the 26                state in which the taxpayer's commercial   SB1739- 53 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                domicile is located. For purposes of this 2                subparagraph (E), it shall be presumed, 3                subject to rebuttal, that taxpayer's 4                commercial domicile is in the state of the 5                United States or the District of Columbia to 6                which the greatest number of employees are 7                regularly connected with the management of the 8                investment or trading income or out of which 9                they are working, irrespective of where the 10                services of such employees are performed, as 11                of the last day of the taxable year. 12            (ix) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 13        2024, receipts from investment assets and activities 14        and trading assets and activities are included in the 15        receipts factor as follows: 16                (1) Interest, dividends, net gains (but not 17            less than zero), and other income from investment 18            assets and activities from trading assets and 19            activities shall be included in the receipts 20            factor. Investment assets and activities and 21            trading assets and activities include, but are not 22            limited to the following: investment securities; 23            trading account assets; federal funds; securities 24            purchased and sold under agreements to resell or 25            repurchase; options; futures contracts; forward 26            contracts; notional principal contracts, such as   SB1739- 54 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            swaps; equities; and foreign currency 2            transactions. With respect to the investment and 3            trading assets and activities described in 4            subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, the 5            receipts factor shall include the amounts 6            described in those subparagraphs. 7                    (A) The receipts factor shall include the 8                amount by which interest from federal funds 9                sold and securities purchased under resale 10                agreements exceeds interest expense on federal 11                funds purchased and securities sold under 12                repurchase agreements. 13                    (B) The receipts factor shall include the 14                amount by which interest, dividends, gains and 15                other income from trading assets and 16                activities, including, but not limited to, 17                assets and activities in the matched book, in 18                the arbitrage book, and foreign currency 19                transactions, exceed amounts paid in lieu of 20                interest, amounts paid in lieu of dividends, 21                and losses from such assets and activities. 22                (2) The numerator of the receipts factor 23            includes interest, dividends, net gains (but not 24            less than zero), and other income from investment 25            assets and activities and from trading assets and 26            activities described in paragraph (1) of this   SB1739- 55 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1            subsection that are attributable to this State. 2                    (A) The amount of interest, dividends, net 3                gains (but not less than zero), and other 4                income from investment assets and activities 5                in the investment account to be attributed to 6                this State and included in the numerator is 7                determined by multiplying all of the income 8                from those assets and activities by a 9                fraction, the numerator of which is the total 10                receipts included in the numerator pursuant to 11                items (i) through (vii) of this subparagraph 12                (3) and the denominator of which is all total 13                receipts included in the denominator, other 14                than interest, dividends, net gains (but not 15                less than zero), and other income from 16                investment assets and activities and trading 17                assets and activities. 18                    (B) The amount of interest from federal 19                funds sold and purchased and from securities 20                purchased under resale agreements and 21                securities sold under repurchase agreements 22                attributable to this State and included in the 23                numerator is determined by multiplying the 24                amount described in subparagraph (A) of 25                paragraph (1) of this subsection from such 26                funds and such securities by a fraction, the   SB1739- 56 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                numerator of which is the total receipts 2                included in the numerator pursuant to items 3                (i) through (vii) of this subparagraph (3) and 4                the denominator of which is all total receipts 5                included in the denominator, other than 6                interest, dividends, net gains (but not less 7                than zero), and other income from investment 8                assets and activities and trading assets and 9                activities. 10                    (C) The amount of interest, dividends, 11                gains, and other income from trading assets 12                and activities, including, but not limited to, 13                assets and activities in the matched book, in 14                the arbitrage book and foreign currency 15                transactions (but excluding amounts described 16                in subparagraphs (A) or (B) of this 17                paragraph), attributable to this State and 18                included in the numerator is determined by 19                multiplying the amount described in 20                subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this 21                subsection by a fraction, the numerator of 22                which is the total receipts included in the 23                numerator pursuant to items (i) through (vii) 24                of this subparagraph (3) and the denominator 25                of which is all total receipts included in the 26                denominator, other than interest, dividends,   SB1739- 57 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1                net gains (but not less than zero), and other 2                income from investment assets and activities 3                and trading assets and activities. 4        (4) (Blank).5        (5) (Blank).6    (c-1) Federally regulated exchanges. For taxable years 7ending on or after December 31, 2012, business income of a 8federally regulated exchange shall, at the option of the 9federally regulated exchange, be apportioned to this State by 10multiplying such income by a fraction, the numerator of which 11is its business income from sources within this State, and the 12denominator of which is its business income from all sources. 13For purposes of this subsection, the business income within 14this State of a federally regulated exchange is the sum of the 15following: 16        (1) Receipts attributable to transactions executed on 17    a physical trading floor if that physical trading floor is 18    located in this State. 19        (2) Receipts attributable to all other matching, 20    execution, or clearing transactions, including without 21    limitation receipts from the provision of matching, 22    execution, or clearing services to another entity, 23    multiplied by (i) for taxable years ending on or after 24    December 31, 2012 but before December 31, 2013, 63.77%; 25    and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 26    2013, 27.54%.   SB1739- 58 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        (3) All other receipts not governed by subparagraphs 2    (1) or (2) of this subsection (c-1), to the extent the 3    receipts would be characterized as "sales in this State" 4    under item (3) of subsection (a) of this Section. 5    "Federally regulated exchange" means (i) a "registered 6entity" within the meaning of 7 U.S.C. Section 1a(40)(A), (B), 7or (C), (ii) an "exchange" or "clearing agency" within the 8meaning of 15 U.S.C. Section 78c (a)(1) or (23), (iii) any such 9entities regulated under any successor regulatory structure to 10the foregoing, and (iv) all taxpayers who are members of the 11same unitary business group as a federally regulated exchange, 12determined without regard to the prohibition in Section 131501(a)(27) of this Act against including in a unitary 14business group taxpayers who are ordinarily required to 15apportion business income under different subsections of this 16Section; provided that this subparagraph (iv) shall apply only 17if 50% or more of the business receipts of the unitary business 18group determined by application of this subparagraph (iv) for 19the taxable year are attributable to the matching, execution, 20or clearing of transactions conducted by an entity described 21in subparagraph (i), (ii), or (iii) of this paragraph. 22    In no event shall the Illinois apportionment percentage 23computed in accordance with this subsection (c-1) for any 24taxpayer for any tax year be less than the Illinois 25apportionment percentage computed under this subsection (c-1) 26for that taxpayer for the first full tax year ending on or   SB1739- 59 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1after December 31, 2013 for which this subsection (c-1) 2applied to the taxpayer. 3    (d) Transportation services. For taxable years ending 4before December 31, 2008, business income derived from 5furnishing transportation services shall be apportioned to 6this State in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2):7        (1) Such business income (other than that derived from 8    transportation by pipeline) shall be apportioned to this 9    State by multiplying such income by a fraction, the 10    numerator of which is the revenue miles of the person in 11    this State, and the denominator of which is the revenue 12    miles of the person everywhere. For purposes of this 13    paragraph, a revenue mile is the transportation of 1 14    passenger or 1 net ton of freight the distance of 1 mile 15    for a consideration. Where a person is engaged in the 16    transportation of both passengers and freight, the 17    fraction above referred to shall be determined by means of 18    an average of the passenger revenue mile fraction and the 19    freight revenue mile fraction, weighted to reflect the 20    person's21            (A) relative railway operating income from total 22        passenger and total freight service, as reported to 23        the Interstate Commerce Commission, in the case of 24        transportation by railroad, and25            (B) relative gross receipts from passenger and 26        freight transportation, in case of transportation   SB1739- 60 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1        other than by railroad.2        (2) Such business income derived from transportation 3    by pipeline shall be apportioned to this State by 4    multiplying such income by a fraction, the numerator of 5    which is the revenue miles of the person in this State, and 6    the denominator of which is the revenue miles of the 7    person everywhere. For the purposes of this paragraph, a 8    revenue mile is the transportation by pipeline of 1 barrel 9    of oil, 1,000 cubic feet of gas, or of any specified 10    quantity of any other substance, the distance of 1 mile 11    for a consideration.12        (3) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 13    2008, business income derived from providing 14    transportation services other than airline services shall 15    be apportioned to this State by using a fraction, (a) the 16    numerator of which shall be (i) all receipts from any 17    movement or shipment of people, goods, mail, oil, gas, or 18    any other substance (other than by airline) that both 19    originates and terminates in this State, plus (ii) that 20    portion of the person's gross receipts from movements or 21    shipments of people, goods, mail, oil, gas, or any other 22    substance (other than by airline) that originates in one 23    state or jurisdiction and terminates in another state or 24    jurisdiction, that is determined by the ratio that the 25    miles traveled in this State bears to total miles 26    everywhere and (b) the denominator of which shall be all   SB1739- 61 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    revenue derived from the movement or shipment of people, 2    goods, mail, oil, gas, or any other substance (other than 3    by airline). Where a taxpayer is engaged in the 4    transportation of both passengers and freight, the 5    fraction above referred to shall first be determined 6    separately for passenger miles and freight miles. Then an 7    average of the passenger miles fraction and the freight 8    miles fraction shall be weighted to reflect the 9    taxpayer's:10            (A) relative railway operating income from total 11        passenger and total freight service, as reported to 12        the Surface Transportation Board, in the case of 13        transportation by railroad; and14            (B) relative gross receipts from passenger and 15        freight transportation, in case of transportation 16        other than by railroad. 17        (4) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 18    2008, business income derived from furnishing airline 19    transportation services shall be apportioned to this State 20    by multiplying such income by a fraction, the numerator of 21    which is the revenue miles of the person in this State, and 22    the denominator of which is the revenue miles of the 23    person everywhere. For purposes of this paragraph, a 24    revenue mile is the transportation of one passenger or one 25    net ton of freight the distance of one mile for a 26    consideration. If a person is engaged in the   SB1739- 62 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    transportation of both passengers and freight, the 2    fraction above referred to shall be determined by means of 3    an average of the passenger revenue mile fraction and the 4    freight revenue mile fraction, weighted to reflect the 5    person's relative gross receipts from passenger and 6    freight airline transportation. 7    (e) Combined apportionment. Where 2 or more persons are 8engaged in a unitary business as described in subsection 9(a)(27) of Section 1501, a part of which is conducted in this 10State by one or more members of the group, the business income 11attributable to this State by any such member or members shall 12be apportioned by means of the combined apportionment method.13    (f) Alternative allocation. If the allocation and 14apportionment provisions of subsections (a) through (e) and of 15subsection (h) do not, for taxable years ending before 16December 31, 2008, fairly represent the extent of a person's 17business activity in this State, or, for taxable years ending 18on or after December 31, 2008, fairly represent the market for 19the person's goods, services, or other sources of business 20income, the person may petition for, or the Director may, 21without a petition, permit or require, in respect of all or any 22part of the person's business activity, if reasonable:23        (1) Separate accounting;24        (2) The exclusion of any one or more factors;25        (3) The inclusion of one or more additional factors 26    which will fairly represent the person's business   SB1739- 63 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1    activities or market in this State; or2        (4) The employment of any other method to effectuate 3    an equitable allocation and apportionment of the person's 4    business income.5    (g) Cross-reference Cross reference. For allocation of 6business income by residents, see Section 301(a).7    (h) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 1998, the 8apportionment factor of persons who apportion their business 9income to this State under subsection (a) shall be equal to:10        (1) for tax years ending on or after December 31, 1998 11    and before December 31, 1999, 16 2/3% of the property 12    factor plus 16 2/3% of the payroll factor plus 66 2/3% of 13    the sales factor;14        (2) for tax years ending on or after December 31, 1999 15    and before December 31, 2000, 8 1/3% of the property 16    factor plus 8 1/3% of the payroll factor plus 83 1/3% of 17    the sales factor;18        (3) for tax years ending on or after December 31, 19    2000, the sales factor.20If, in any tax year ending on or after December 31, 1998 and 21before December 31, 2000, the denominator of the payroll, 22property, or sales factor is zero, the apportionment factor 23computed in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection for that 24year shall be divided by an amount equal to 100% minus the 25percentage weight given to each factor whose denominator is 26equal to zero.  SB1739- 64 -LRB104 03450 HLH 13473 b1(Source: P.A. 102-40, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 2103-592, eff. 6-7-24; revised 10-16-24.)